Utah statutes.
59-7-534.   Failure to pay tax -- Suspension or forfeiture of corporate rights.

(1)  If a tax computed and levied under this chapter is not paid before 5 p.m. on the last day of the 11th month after the date of delinquency, the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of the delinquent taxpayer, if it is a domestic corporation, shall be suspended, and if a foreign corporation, it shall forfeit its rights to do intrastate business in this state.

(2)  The commission shall transmit the name of each such corporation to the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code, which shall immediately record the same in such manner that it may be available to the public. This suspension or forfeiture shall become effective from the time such record is made, and the certificate of the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall be prima facie evidence of such suspension or forfeiture.

